Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 1. General Provisions

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Wyoming Statutory Foundation Act”.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Articles of formation” means the articles required by W.S.

17-30-303

, including any amendments thereto and restatements thereof;

“Beneficiary” means a person who is or may be designated as a beneficiary in the operating agreement or in accordance with the operating agreement of a statutory foundation. A “beneficiary” may be any one (1) or more of the following:

A person who has a present or future, vested or contingent interest in the statutory foundation;

If permitted under the terms in the operating agreement, a person designated as a beneficiary of the statutory foundation by the board of directors, at the discretion of the board of directors;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 2.

“Certificate of existence” means the certificate issued to a statutory foundation under W.S.

17-30-308

;

“Certificate of registration” means the certificate of registration of a foreign foundation required under W.S.

17-30-1101

;

“Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of a health, governmental, municipal or other purpose, the achievement of which is beneficial to the community;

“Contributor” means any person, excluding a founder, who contributes property to a statutory foundation;

“Court” means the district court of the county where a statutory foundation has its registered office or another court of competent jurisdiction which is the most appropriate forum in the circumstances;

“Financial institution” means a bank, savings and loan association or state chartered credit union;

“Foreign foundation” means an entity formed under the law of a foreign jurisdiction as a statutory foundation, pursuant to the law of the foreign jurisdiction, or which appears to the secretary of state to possess characteristics sufficiently similar to those of a statutory foundation organized under this act;

“Founder” or “organizer” means one (1) or more persons that acts under W.S.

17-30-303

to form a statutory foundation. The organizer acts on behalf of the founder in forming the statutory foundation and may but not need be one (1) of the founders;

“Insolvency law” means title 11, United States Code or successor federal statutes of general application;

“Operating agreement” means the written agreement, whether or not designated as an operating agreement, of a founder or board of directors of a statutory foundation concerning the matters described in W.S.

17-30-309

, including any amendments thereto and restatements thereof;

“Person” means as defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(vi);

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 2.

“Principal office” means the principal executive office of a statutory foundation or a foreign foundation, whether or not the office is located in this state;

“Protector” means the person designated as a protector of a statutory foundation under W.S.

17-30-503

;

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“Registered agent” means a person appointed as a registered agent under W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

;

“Sign” or “signature” shall include any manual, facsimile, conformed or electronic signature;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Statutory foundation” means an entity formed or continued under this act;

“This act” means W.S.

17-30-101

through

17-30-1102

.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, by ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, rewrote (a)(ii), which read, "'Beneficiary' means a person designated as a beneficiary in the operating agreement of a statutory foundation, which may be any of the following:"; deleted ", beneficial" following "contingent" in (a)(ii)(A); in (a)(v), added "or other" following "municipal," deleted "other purposes" following "achievement of," substituted "is" for "are" and made related changes; substituted "a bank, savings and loan association or state chartered credit union" for "as defined in W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix)" in (a)(viii); added the second sentence in (a)(x); added "or board of directors" in (a)(xii)l repealed (a)(ii)(C), which read, "A charitable organization, as defined in paragraph (v) of this subsection"; and repealed (a)(xiv), which read, "'Power' shall include discretion as to the way in which an act may be performed."

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-103.
Governing law.

This act governs:

The internal affairs of a statutory foundation; and

The liability of a person as a founder or contributor of a statutory foundation for the debts, obligations or other liabilities of a statutory foundation.

The transfer of property by a founder or a contributor to the statutory foundation, or any disposition made subject to the terms of the operating agreement of the statutory foundation, shall not be void, voidable, set aside or defective in any manner for any reason, including the following:

The law of a foreign jurisdiction prohibits or does not recognize the concept of a statutory foundation; or

The statutory foundation, a transfer of property by a founder or a contributor to a foundation or a disposition made subject to the terms of the operating agreement of the statutory foundation avoids or defeats any forced heirship or legitime right, claim or interest under the law of a foreign jurisdiction.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, in (b), added "statutory" preceding "foundation," substituted "be void, voidable, set aside or defective in any manner" for "rendered ineffective"; added "or" at the end of (b)(i); and added "statutory" preceding "foundation" in (b)(ii).

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-104.
Supplemental principles of law.

The principles of law and equity shall supplement this act, unless in conflict with this act.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-105.
Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this act governing the legal effect, validity or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, shall be construed to conform to the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7002, and supersede, modify and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-106.
Powers of secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate reasonable rules, forms and other requirements which are necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.